Utah statutes.
57-23-10.   Prosecution -- Penalties.

(1)  The director may refer any available evidence concerning violations of this chapter or of any rule or order under this chapter to the attorney general or the appropriate prosecuting attorney, who may, in turn, institute the appropriate civil or criminal proceedings under this chapter.

(2)  Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(3)  For purposes of applying Title 13, Chapter 11, Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act, any material violation of the provisions of this chapter constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice or unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce.

(4)  The remedies provided in this chapter are cumulative and nonexclusive, and do not affect any other remedy available at law.



Enacted by Chapter 169, 1992 General Session

